tables/en-us-interline.ctb
# liblouis: Braille Translation and Back-Translation Library
#
#   Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#   The BRLTTY Team
#
#   Copyright (C) 2004, 2005, 2006
#   ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#   and
#   JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#   All rights reserved
#
#   This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#   under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by the
#   Free Software Foundation; either version 2, or (at your option) any
#   later version.
#
#In addition to the permissions and restrictions contained in the GNU
#General Public License (GPL), the copyright holders grant two explicit
#permissions and impose one explicit restriction. The permissions are:
#
#1) Using, copying, merging, publishing, distributing, sublicensing, 
#   and/or selling copies of this software that are either compiled or loaded 
#   as part of and/or linked into other code is not bound by the GPL.
#
#2) Modifying copies of this software as needed in order to facilitate 
#   compiling and/or linking with other code is not bound by the GPL.
#
#The restriction is:
#
#3. The translation, semantic-action and configuration tables that are 
#   read at run-time are considered part of this code and are under the terms 
#   of the GPL. Any changes to these tables and any additional tables that are 
#   created for use by this code must be made publicly available.
#
#All other uses, including modifications not required for compiling or 
#linking and distribution of code which is not linked into a combined 
#executable, are bound by the terms of the GPL.
#
#   This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#   WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
#   General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#   along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write to
#   the Free Software Foundation, 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor,
#   Boston, MA 02110-1301, USA.
#
#   Maintained by John J. Boyer john.boyer@jjb-software.com
#   
# liblouis: U.S. English Grade 1 table
#
# Based on the braille contraction modules in BRLTTY
#
# Original copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. 
# All rights reserved.
#
# liblouis copyright 2004 by 
# ViewPlus Technologies, inc.,  www.viewplustech.com
# and
# Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org  
# All rights reserved.
#
# liblouis  comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation.  Please see the file COPYING for details.
#
# Maintained by John J. Boyer, director@chpi.org, www.chpi.org
#
include chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
multind 56-6 letsign capsign
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
firstwordital 46-46
lastworditalbefore 46
lenitalphrase 4
firstletterital 46-3
lastletterital 46-36
singleletterital 46-25
firstwordbold 456-456
lastwordboldbefore 456
lenboldphrase 4
begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156

# the decimal digits
litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245

# Letters are defined in en-chardefs
# punctuation
prepunc ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
prepunc ` 6-236
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
begnum # 1345-135-256 print number sign before number
midnum , 2
postpunc , 2
decpoint . 46
midnum - 36
hyphen - 36
postpunc . 256
postpunc ; 23
midnum : 25
postpunc : 25
postpunc ! 235
midnum / 34
always / 456-34
always < 5-13
always = 46-13
always > 46-2
postpunc ? 236
endnum st 34
endnum nd 1345-145
endnum rd 1235-145
endnum s 234
endnum th 1456
endnum 's 3-234
endnum % 4-25-1234
midnum ^ 45
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 4-16
always * 35-35
prepunc [ 6-2356
postpunc ] 2356-3
prepunc { 56-2356
postpunc } 2356-23
prepunc ` 6-236
always @ 4-1
always \\ 4-1256
always | 456-1256
always ..." 3-3-3-356
always ... 3-3-3
begnum $ 256-3456

# special character sequences
compbrl :// URLs
compbrl ()
compbrl www.
compbrl ::
compbrl .com
compbrl .edu
compbrl .gov
compbrl .ini
compbrl .mil
compbrl .net
compbrl .org
compbrl .doc
compbrl .htm
compbrl .html
compbrl .tex
compbrl .txt
compbrl .gif
compbrl .jpg
compbrl .png
compbrl .wav
compbrl .tar
compbrl .zip

letsign 56
# the letter a
largesign a 1
largesign A 1
always aar 1-345 Aaron
always aa 1-1 back-translation: maasai
word about 1-12
word thereabouts 5-2346-1-12-234
word runabout 1235-136-1345-1-12
contraction ab
sufword above 1-12-1236
contraction abv
word according 1-14
contraction ac
word accordingly 1-14-123-13456
contraction acly
word across 1-14-1235
contraction acr
always aed =
always aer = Rosenlaer
begword aforem 1-123456-15-134 aforementioned 
word aforesaid 1-123456-15-234-145
sufword after 1-124
contraction af
always afternoon 1-124-1345 afternoons
contraction afn
sufword afterward 1-124-2456
contraction afw
word again 1-1245
contraction ag
word against 1-1245-34
always agery =
midendword ally 6-13456
word almost 1-123-134
contraction alm
word already 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word also 1-123
contraction al
word although 1-123-1456
word altogether 1-123-2345
contraction alt
word always 1-123-2456
contraction alw
midendword ance 46-15
largesign and 12346
always andar 12346-345 staodard
midendword anda 12346-1 panda
midword angh = Shanghai
begword anted =
always anterior 1-1345-2345-23456-24-135-1235
begword anter =
begword aqued = aqueduct
always ar 345
word aright 1-5-1235
word as 1356
contraction as
always athe 1-2346 back-translation: lathe
midendword ation 6-1345
midendword aunder 1-136-1345-145-12456 saunders
begword auto = autofocus
syllable away =

# the letter b
midword bb 23
midendword bble 12-3456
lowword be 23
begword be 23
begword bea 12-2
always bear 12-15-345
begword beatif 23-1-2345-24-124
begword beatit 23-1-2345-24-2345
begword beatr 23-1-2345-1235 Beatrice
always beck 12-15-14-13
always bed 12-1246
begword beda 23-145-1 bedazzle
begword bede 23-145-15 bedevil
word bede 12-1246-15 bede (a name)
begword bedi 23-145-24 bedizzened
word bee 12-15-15
begword bee 12-15-15
always been 12-15-26
always beer 12-15-12456
word beg =
begword begg 12-15-2356
word begs =
begword bei = beijing
sufword being 23-346
sufword belch 12-15-123-16
begword beld = Beldon
begword belf = belfry, belfast
begword belg = Belgium
begword belk = Belkin
always bell =
begword belm = Belmont
always belt =
begword belw = belwether
always ben 12-26
begword beni 12-26-24
begword benif 23-1345-24-124 benificient
sufword benign 23-1345-24-1245-1345 benignity
begword benov 23-1345-135-1236 benovolent
begword benu 23-1345-136 benumbed
begword ber 12-12456
begword bera 23-1235-1 berating
begword bere 23-1235-15 bereft
begword berea 23-1235-2 bereaved
begword beri 23-1235-24 beribboned
always best 12-15-34
sufword bestow 23-34-246
word bethel 12-15-2346-123
syllable beth 12-15-1456 Bethany
always bethe 12-15-2346 Bethel (Hans) Bethe
always bets =
always bett =
sufword bev = bevies
begword bever 12-5-15 Beverly beverage
always bio =
midendword bious 12-24-1256-234 dubious
always bottlen = bottlenosed
joinword by 356
word because 23-14
word bec =
sufword before 23-124
sufword behind 23-125
word behring 12-15-125-1235-346
word bel =
begword beln = Belnick
word below 23-123
word beneath 23-1345
sufword beside 23-234
sufword bess = Bessie
word between 23-2345
word bet =
word beyond 23-13456
word bey =
always bleu =
midendword ble 3456
midendword bleau 12-123-2-136 tableau
syllable bleed 12-123-15-1246 nosebleed
always bless 12-46-234 joblessness
word blind 12-123
contraction bl
begword blindf 12-123-124 blindfold
word blindly 12-123-123-13456
word blindness 12-123-56-234
sufword blinds 12-123-234 blindsided
always braille 12-1235-123
contraction brl
word but 12

# the letter c
midword cch 14-16
always chloro 16-123-135-1235-135
begword cofac = cofactor
always cofound 14-135-124-46-145
begword com 36
sufword common 36-134-135-1345 commonest
begword con 25
sufword conceive 25-14-1236
sufword conceiving 25-14-1236-1245
always conch 14-135-1345-16
always cone 14-5-135
word cons 14-135-1345-234
sufword conundrum = 
sufword could 14-145
word could've 14-145-3-1236-15
contraction cd
always cred 14-1235-1246 incredulous
midword cc 25
word can 14
always cannot 456-14
always ch 16
syllable chand 16-12346 merchandise
always character 5-16
always chemo 16-15-134-135
word child 16
always children 16-1345
sufword clever 14-123-5-15 cleverest

# the letter d
always daredevil 145-345-15-145-15-1236-24-123
always day 5-145
always dday 145-5-145
begword deact = deactivation
begword deall = deallocate
begword decarb 145-15-14-345-12
always deceive 145-14-1236
contraction dcv
contraction dcvd
contraction dcvr
contraction dcvs
always deceiving 145-14-1236-1245
contraction dcvg
always declare 145-14-123
contraction dcl
contraction dcld
contraction dclr
contraction dcls
word declaring 145-14-123-1245
contraction dclg
begword deref = dereferencing
begword dereg = deregulation
midword dd 256
begword dedic 145-1246-24-14 dedicated
always dedu = nondeductible
begword deno = denote
always denom =
begword denou 145-15-1345-1256 denounce
begword denu = denunciation
begword dera = derail
begword deri 145-15-1235-24
begword dero = derogatory
begword dinu 145-24-1345-136
begword dis 256
word disc =
word discs =
always dish 145-24-146
begword disha 256-125-1 dishabile
begword dishear 256-125-15-345 disheartened
begword disho 256-125-135 dishonor
begword dishone 256-125-5-135 dishonest
sufword disk =
sufword dispirit 145-24-456-234 dispirited
begword disul = disulfide
word do 145
syllable down 145-246-1345 facedown
syllable drum = kettledrum
always edom =
always reduc =
always seduc =
# syllable dun =

# the letter e
midword ea 2
midword eabil = interchangeability
always eable 15-1-3456
endword eably = noticeably
midendword eage = mileage
midendword eager 2-1245-12456 meager
always eally 15-6-13456
midendword eance 15-46-15 vengeance
midendword eand 15-12346 meander
always eation 15-6-1345
always ear 15-345
always ed 1246
begword edic = edict Benedict
sufword edition 15-145-24-56-1345 editions
syllable draw =
word either 15-24
contraction ei
word en =
always en 26
always ename 15-5-1345
sufword enamel 26-1-134-15-123 enameled
midendword ence 56-15
syllable neck = bottleneck
midendword eness 15-56-234 closeness
begword enor = enormous
begword enou 15-1345-1256
lowword enough 26
word enough 26-1256-126
begword enu 15-1345-136
always er 12456
begword era =
word eras 12456-1-234
begword erec = erect 
begword ero 15-1235-135
syllable room = storeroom
begword eru = erupt
always ever 5-15
midendword evere 15-1236-12456-15 Everest
always evered 15-1236-12456-1246
word every 15

# the letter f
midword ff 235
syllable ffold 235-135-123-145 scaffold
always father 5-124
always fein 124-15-35 Feingold
always first 124-34
always fever 124-15-1236-12456
always ffor 124-123456
largesign for 123456
begword fora 123456-1 foramen
always fore 123456-15
begword forens 123456-26-234 forensic
always forever 123456-5-15 forevermore
syllable fold =
syllable foot =
word from 124
word friend 124-1235
word friends 124-1235-234
word friendless 124-1235-46-234
sufword friendship 124-1235-146-24-1234
sufword friendl 124-1235-123
contraction fr
midendword ful 56-123
always funder 124-136-1345-145-12456
